Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature makes the following findings:(1) It is necessary to establish a Washington state commission on boys and men to address systemic challenges facing boys, male youth, and men in Washington state;(2) A successful society requires its institutions to recognize and respond to the distinct characteristics and needs of both males and females. Disaggregated data by sex demonstrate that sustained efforts to expand opportunity for women and girls have resulted in significant gains and have strengthened Washington state and the nation;(3) Many institutional frameworks have not sufficiently accounted for male-specific developmental, biological, and social needs, contributing to persistent disparities affecting boys and men across education, public safety, health, housing, and workforce participation;(4) Disaggregated data demonstrate significant and persistent disparities affecting boys and men in Washington state, including disproportionate involvement in the criminal and juvenile justice systems, higher rates of homelessness, substance abuse, violent victimization, and suicide;(5) Research demonstrates a strong association between father absence and increased risks of negative outcomes for boys, including justice system involvement, educational disengagement, and substance abuse;(6) Addiction is a significant contributing factor to incarceration, family instability, and long-term social withdrawal, and that these outcomes impose substantial social and fiscal costs on the state;(7) Biological and developmental differences between males and females influence behavior, learning, health, and social outcomes, and that institutions should account for these differences while minimizing bias and stereotypes;(8) Stronger outcomes for men and fathers contribute to stronger families, safer communities, and improved long-term social stability;(9) A commission on boys and men is necessary to assess systemic, cultural, and institutional factors contributing to these outcomes and to develop evidence-based policy recommendations to improve outcomes for boys and men; and(10) Improving outcomes for boys and men is not intended to diminish gains made by women and girls, but to strengthen opportunity, stability, and well-being for all residents of Washington state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men is established in the office of the governor.(2) In carrying out its duties under this chapter, the commission shall focus on the following areas as they affect boys, male youth, and men in Washington state:(a) Mental health, physical health, substance use, addiction, suicide, and premature mortality, including prevention and early intervention strategies;(b) Educational development and attainment, including early childhood development, Kâ12 education, postsecondary education, and workforce preparation;(c) Workforce participation, career pathways, and economic stability, including transitions from education to employment;(d) Fatherhood, family formation, and family stability, including the effects of father absence, single parenting, and policies affecting durable family relationships;(e) The causes and prevention of disproportionate involvement of boys and men in the criminal and juvenile justice systems, including the preschool-to-prison pipeline and alternatives to justice system involvement; and(f) The experiences of boys and men within public systems, including schools, health systems, housing systems, workforce programs, and criminal, juvenile, and family courts.(3) The commission shall be administered by an executive director appointed by, and serving at the pleasure of, the governor. The governor shall set the salary of the executive director. The executive director may employ staff as necessary, subject to available funding.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men consists of 15 nonlegislative voting members appointed as follows:(a) Three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;(b) Three members appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives;(c) Three members appointed by the president of the senate;(d) Three members appointed by the minority leader of the senate; and(e) Three members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate.(2) Appointing authorities may appoint only individuals with demonstrated, credentialed subject matter expertise in one or more of the commission's focus areas.(3) Appointments must, to the extent practicable, reflect diverse professional perspectives and geographic regions of the state.(4) Initial terms must be staggered by lot, with five members serving one-year terms, five serving two-year terms, and five serving three-year terms. Thereafter, terms are three years.(5) Vacancies must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.(6) The commission shall elect a chair and vice chair from among the voting membership.(7) Two members of the senate, one from each major political party, appointed by the president of the senate, and two members of the house of representatives, one from each major political party, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, shall serve as nonvoting legislative advisory members.(8) Nonlegislative members serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative advisory members may be reimbursed under RCW 44.04.120.(9) A simple majority of voting members constitutes a quorum.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men shall:(a) Collect and analyze disaggregated data to identify disparities affecting boys and men;(b) Evaluate systemic, cultural, and institutional factors contributing to those disparities;(c) Examine factors related to mental health, addiction, suicide, and premature mortality and identify evidence-based prevention strategies;(d) Assess educational and workforce pathways and barriers to engagement and attainment;(e) Examine the role of fatherhood and family stability in outcomes for boys and men;(f) Evaluate causes and prevention strategies related to justice system involvement;(g) Review the experiences of boys and men within public systems and identify opportunities for improvement;(h) Consult with state agencies and relevant stakeholders;(i) Provide recommendations to the governor and the legislature;(j) Serve as a clearinghouse for information and research;(k) Hold public hearings; and(l) Submit a biennial report to the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.(2) State agencies shall provide reasonable assistance to the commission upon request.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) The Washington state commission on boys and men may solicit and receive gifts, grants, and endowments and expend funds consistent with this chapter.(2) The commission may enter into agreements with public and private entities.(3) The commission may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to carry out this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.--- END ---